District of Columbia statutes.
2-303.19

Repealed

Report of procurement actions made pursuant to §§ 2-303.05 and 12-303.12.

Repealed.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 319, 32 DCR 7396
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185
1981 Ed., § 1-1183.19.